Ohio, session 136, HB961.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 5901.10 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 5901.10. (A) As used in this section: "Compensation" means any money, thing of value, or economic benefit conferred on, or received by, a person in return for services rendered, or to be rendered, by the person or another. "Person" has the meaning defined in section 1101.01 of the Revised Code. "Veterans benefits matter" means the preparation, presentation, or prosecution of, or advising, consulting, or assisting an individual regarding any claim affecting any person who has filed or expressed an intent to file a claim for any benefit, program, service, commodity, function, status, or entitlement that is determined to pertain to veterans, their dependents, their survivors, or any other person eligible for such benefits under the laws and regulations administered by the United States department of veterans affairs or by the state. (B) No person shall do any of the following: (1) Receive compensation for preparation, presentation, or prosecution of, or advising, consulting, or assisting an individual regarding any veterans benefits matter, except as permitted under federal law; (2) Receive compensation from an individual for referring that individual to another person to advise or assist the individual with any veterans benefits matter; (3) Provide a guarantee, either directly or by implication, that an individual is certain to be awarded specific veterans or dependent benefits, or certain to receive a specific rating, level, percentage, or amount of benefits from programs administered by the United States department of veterans affairs; (4) Render assistance, for compensation, to an individual regarding a veterans benefits matter without a fee agreement properly registered according to 38 C.F.R. 14.636. (C) A person seeking compensation for providing assistance regarding a veterans benefits matter shall be accredited by the United States department of veterans affairs under 38 C.F.R. 14.629. (D) A violation of this section constitutes an unfair or deceptive act or practice in connection with a consumer transaction under Chapter 1345. of the Revised Code. Section 2. This act shall be known as the Veterans Empowerment Through Ethical Representation and Navigation Act (V.E.T.E.R.A.N. Benefits Protection Act).